Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,123
Home services; requirements.

No licensee may perform home services except when employed by or under contract to a salon holding a valid home services permit.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 123;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 23;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 49;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,162;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 385.